Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,119.02
Professional development programs; rules and regulations.

The examining board shall adopt and promulgate such administrative procedures and rules and regulations as are necessary for the effective delivery and certification of all programs of professional development required in section 81-8,119.01.

Laws 1984, LB 478, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 874, § 18.